Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1246
State investment officer; investments; duties.

The state investment officer shall invest in investments of the nature which individuals of prudence, discretion, and intelligence acquire or retain in dealing with the property of another, and if the state investment officer has special skills or is named on the basis of representations of special skills or expertise, he or she is under a duty to use such skills, subject to the direction of the Nebraska Investment Council.

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 10, p. 2352;

Laws 1971, LB 152, § 1;

Laws 1974, LB 396, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 460, § 1;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 19.